Maryland, session 2025, HB0024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–1605.2.
(h) (1) With regard to the funds collected under subsection (b)(1)(i)1 of this
section from users of an on–site sewage disposal system or holding tank that receive a water
bill and subsection (b)(1)(i)2 and 3 of this section, beginning in fiscal year 2006, the
Comptroller shall:
(i) Establish a separate account within the Bay Restoration Fund;
and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0024*

HOUSE BILL 24
(ii) Disburse the funds as provided under paragraph (2) of this
subsection.
(2) The Comptroller shall:
(i) Deposit 60% of the funds in the separate account to be used for:
1. Subject to paragraphs (3), (4), (5), [and] (6), AND (7) of
this subsection, with priority first given to failing systems and holding tanks located in the
Chesapeake and Atlantic Coastal Bays Critical Area and then to failing systems that the
Department determines are a threat to public health or water quality, grants or loans for
up to 100% of:
A. The costs attributable to upgrading an on–site sewage
disposal system to the best available technology for the removal of nitrogen;
B. The cost difference between a conventional on–site sewage
disposal system and a system that utilizes the best available technology for the removal of
nitrogen;
C. The cost of repairing or replacing a failing on–site sewage
disposal system with a system that uses the best available technology for nitrogen removal;
D. The cost, up to the sum of the costs authorized under item
B of this item for each individual system, of replacing multiple on–site sewage disposal
systems located in the same community with a new community sewerage system that is
owned by a local government and that meets enhanced nutrient removal standards; [or]
E. The cost, up to the sum of the costs authorized under item
C of this item for each individual system, of connecting a property using an on–site sewage
disposal system to an existing municipal wastewater facility that is achieving enhanced
nutrient removal or biological nutrient removal level treatment, including payment of the
principal, but not interest, of debt issued by a local government for such connection costs;
OR
F. SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (6) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE COST OF CONNECTING A PROPERTY IN A LOW–INCOME AREA, AS DEFINED BY
THE DEPARTMENT, THAT IS USING AN ON–SITE SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM TO AN
EXISTING MUNICIPAL WASTEWATER FACILITY, REGARDLESS OF THE LEVEL OF
NUTRIENT REMOVAL OR BIOLOGICAL NUTRIENT LEVEL TREATMENT, INCLUDING
PAYMENT OF THE PRINCIPAL, BUT NOT INTEREST, OF DEBT ISSUED BY A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT FOR SUCH CONNECTION COSTS;
2. The reasonable costs of the Department, not to exceed 8%
of the funds deposited into the separate account, to:

HOUSE BILL 24 3
A. Implement an education, outreach, and upgrade program
to advise owners of on–site sewage disposal systems and holding tanks on the proper
maintenance of the systems and tanks and the availability of grants and loans under item
1 of this item;
B. Review and approve the design and construction of on–site
sewage disposal system or holding tank upgrades;
C. Issue grants or loans as provided under item 1 of this item;
and
D. Provide technical support for owners of upgraded on–site
sewage disposal systems or holding tanks to operate and maintain the upgraded systems;
3. A portion of the reasonable costs of a local public entity
that has been delegated by the Department under § 1–301(b) of this article to administer
and enforce environmental laws, not to exceed 10% of the funds deposited into the separate
account, to implement regulations adopted by the Department for on–site sewage disposal
systems that utilize the best available technology for the removal of nitrogen;
4. Subject to paragraph [(7)] (8) of this subsection, financial
assistance to low–income homeowners, as defined by the Department, for up to 50% of the
cost of an operation and maintenance contract of up to 5 years for an on–site sewage
disposal system that utilizes nitrogen removal technology;
5. Subject to paragraph [(8)] (9) of this subsection, a local
jurisdiction to provide financial assistance to eligible homeowners for the reasonable cost
of pumping out an on–site sewage disposal system, at least once every 5 years, unless a
more frequent pump out schedule is recommended during an inspection, not to exceed 10%
of the funds allocated to the local jurisdiction; and
6. In fiscal years 2020 and 2021, financial assistance to a
local jurisdiction for the development of a septic stewardship plan that meets the
requirements under paragraph [(8)(iii)2] (9)(III)2 of this subsection; and
(ii) Transfer 40% of the funds to the Maryland Agriculture Water
Quality Cost Share Program in the Department of Agriculture in order to fund cover crop
activities.
(3) Funding for the costs identified in paragraph (2)(i)1 of this subsection
shall be provided in the following order of priority:
(i) For owners of all levels of income, the costs identified in
paragraph (2)(i)1A and B of this subsection; [and]
(ii) For low–income owners, as defined by the Department, the costs
identified in paragraph (2)(i)1C of this subsection:

HOUSE BILL 24
1. First, for best available technologies for nitrogen removal;
and
2. Second, for other wastewater treatment systems; AND
(III) FOR OWNERS WITH A HOUSEHOLD INCOME UP TO $300,000
PER YEAR, THE COSTS IDENTIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (2)(I)1F OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(4) Funding for the costs identified in paragraph (2)(i)1D of this subsection
may be provided if:
(i) The environmental impact of the on–site sewage disposal system
is documented by the local government and confirmed by the Department;
(ii) It can be demonstrated that:
1. The replacement of the on–site sewage disposal system
with a new community sewerage system is more cost effective for nitrogen removal than
upgrading each individual on–site sewage disposal system; or
2. The individual replacement of the on–site sewage disposal
system is not feasible; and
(iii) The new community sewerage system will only serve lots that
have received a certificate of occupancy, or equivalent certificate, on or before October 1,
2008.
(5) Funding for the costs identified in paragraph (2)(i)1E of this subsection
may be provided only if all of the following conditions are met:
(i) The environmental impact of the on–site sewage disposal system
is documented by the local government and confirmed by the Department;
(ii) It can be demonstrated that:
1. The replacement of the on–site sewage disposal system
with service to an existing municipal wastewater facility that is achieving, or has signed a
funding agreement with the Department and is under construction to achieve, enhanced
nutrient removal or biological nutrient removal level treatment is more cost–effective for
nitrogen removal than upgrading the individual on–site sewage disposal system; or
2. The individual replacement of the on–site sewage disposal
system is not feasible;
(iii) The project is consistent with the county’s comprehensive plan
and water and sewer master plan;

HOUSE BILL 24 5
(iv) 1. The on–site sewage disposal system was installed as of
October 1, 2008, and the property the system serves is located in a priority funding area,
in accordance with § 5–7B–02 of the State Finance and Procurement Article; or
2. The on–site sewage disposal system was installed as of
October 1, 2008, the property the system serves is not located in a priority funding area,
and the project meets the requirements under § 5–7B–06 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article and is consistent with a public health area of concern:
A. Identified in the county water and sewer plan; or
B. Certified by a county environmental health director with
concurrence by the Department and, if funding is approved, subsequently added to the
county water and sewer plan within a time frame jointly agreed on by the Department and
the county that takes into consideration the county’s water and sewer plan update and
amendment process; and
(v) The funding agreement for a project that meets the conditions for
funding under subparagraph (iv)2 of this paragraph includes provisions to ensure:
1. Denial of access for any future connections that are not
included in the project’s proposed service area; and
2. That the project will not unduly impede access to funding
for upgrading individual on–site sewage disposal systems in the county with best available
technology for nitrogen removal.
(6) FUNDING FOR THE COSTS IDENTIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (2)(I)1F OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE PROVIDED ONLY IF THE HOUSEHOLD SERVED BY THE
ON–SITE SEWAGE DISPOSAL SYSTEM TO BE REPLACED:
(I) IS LOCATED IN A LOW–INCOME AREA, AS DETERMINED BY
THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) HAS A HOUSEHOLD INCOME OF UP TO $300,000 PER YEAR;
AND
(III) IS LOCATED ADJACENT TO AN EXISTING SEWER MAIN.
(7) The Comptroller, in consultation with the Administration, may
establish any other accounts and subaccounts within the Bay Restoration Fund as
necessary to:
(i) Effectuate the purposes of this subtitle;

HOUSE BILL 24
(ii) Comply with the provisions of any bond resolution;
(iii) Meet the requirements of any federal or State law or of any grant
or award to the Bay Restoration Fund; and
(iv) Meet any rules or program directives established by the
Secretary or the Board.
[(7)] (8) The Department or a local government shall determine:
(i) Whether an applicant is eligible for financial assistance under
paragraph (2)(i)4 of this subsection; and
(ii) The amount of financial assistance to be provided for each
applicant based on the average cost of an operation and maintenance contract of up to 5
years provided by vendors, as defined in § 9–1108.1 of this title, in the applicant’s area.
[(8)] (9) (i) The amount of financial assistance under paragraph
(2)(i)5 of this subsection shall be based on homeowner income, with priority given to
low–income homeowners.
(ii) Financial assistance under paragraph (2)(i)5 of this subsection
may be provided through grants, rebates, or low– or no–interest loans.
(iii) Financial assistance under paragraph (2)(i)5 of this subsection
may be provided only if:
1. The homeowner verifies the pump out has occurred; and
2. The homeowner resides in a local jurisdiction that has
developed and implemented a septic stewardship plan that:
A. Has been adopted by the local governing body of the
jurisdiction, after consultation with the jurisdiction’s local health department;
B. States specific goals consistent with the nitrogen load
reduction identified in the local jurisdiction’s watershed implementation plan;
C. Specifies public education and outreach measures that
will be taken, including education and outreach on best management practices, legal
requirements, and existing support and financial assistance;
D. Provides technical guidance for the siting, design,
evaluation, and construction of an on–site sewage disposal system;

HOUSE BILL 24 7
E. Requires an on–site sewage disposal system located on
residential property to be pumped out and inspected at least once every 5 years, unless a
more frequent pump out schedule is recommended during an inspection;
F. Requires an on–site sewage disposal system located on
commercial property to be pumped out and inspected at least once every 5 years, unless a
more frequent pump out schedule is recommended during an inspection;
G. Specifies certification and licensing procedures for a
person that pumps out and inspects on–site sewage disposal systems;
H. Specifies enforcement mechanisms, compliance
incentives, and penalties;
I. Outlines funding mechanisms to support the plan and
expand education, demonstration projects, and inspections;
J. Specifies requirements for record keeping; and
K. Establishes a process for periodically evaluating and
revising the plan.
[(9)] (10) On or before December 31 each year, the Department of the
Environment shall submit a report, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, to the House Environmental Matters Committee and the Senate Education,
Energy, and the Environment Committee on:
(i) Each project funded under paragraph (5)(iv)2 of this subsection;
and
(ii) A summary of any impacts that the funding used for these
projects had on overall funding for upgrading individual on–site sewage disposal systems
with best available technology for nitrogen removal.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.